nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Camping og fjellvandring > Campingmøbler > Tilbehør til luftmadrasser og sovemadrasser: Pumper til luftmadrasser og sovemadrasser; Reparasjonssett til luftmadrasser og sovemadrasser; Ventiler til luftmadrasser og liggeunderlag
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Kamperen en wandelen > Kampeermeubilair > Accessoires voor luchtbedden: Pompen voor luchtbedden; Reparatiekits voor luchtbedden; Ventielen voor luchtbedden en slaapmatten
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Campeggio e trekking > Attrezzatura da campeggio > Accessori per materassi e materassini ad aria: Pompe per materassi ad aria e materassini; Kit di riparazione per materassi ad aria e materassini; Valvole per materassini gonfiabili e stuoini
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > キャンプ ・ハイキング > キャンプ用家具 > エアマットレス関連用品: エアマットレスパンプ; エアマットレス修理キット; エアーマットレス・スリーピングパッド用バルブ
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Camping, vandring och backpacking > Campingmöbler > Tillbehör till luftmadrasser och liggunderlag: Pumpar till luftmadrasser och liggunderlag; Reparationskit till luftmadrasser och liggunderlag; Ventiler till luftmadrasser och liggunderlag
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Kampiranje i planinarenje > Namještaj za kamp > Pribor za zračne madrace i podloge za spavanje: Pumpe za zračne madrace i podloge za spavanje; Kompleti za popravak zračnih madraca i podloga za spavanje; Ventili za zračne madrace i podloge za spavanje
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Camping et randonnée > Matériel de camping > Accessoires pour matelas gonflables et matelas en mousse: Pompes pour matelas gonflables et matelas en mousse; Kits de réparation pour matelas gonflables et matelas en mousse; Valves pour matelas pneumatiques et matelas de sol
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Kempovanie a turistika > Kempovací nábytok > Príslušenstvo pre nafukovacie matrace a podložky na spanie: Pumpy pre nafukovacie matrace a podložky na spanie; Súpravy na opravu nafukovacích matracov a podložiek na spanie; Ventily pre nafukovacie matrace a podložky na spanie
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κατασκήνωση & πεζοπορία > Έπιπλα κατασκήνωσης > Αξεσουάρ στρωμάτων αέρα & υπνόσακων: Αντλίες στρωμάτων αέρα & υπνόσακων; Σετ επισκευής στρωμάτων αέρα & υπνόσακων; Βαλβίδες για στρώματα αέρα και υποστρώματα ύπνου
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kampiranje in pohodništvo > Pohištvo za kampiranje > Dodatki za zračne vzmetnice in spalne podloge: Tlačilke za zračne vzmetnice in spalne podloge; Kompleti za popravilo zračnih vzmetnic in spalnih podlog; Ventili za zračne vzmetnice in spalne podloge
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Acampamento e caminhada > Móveis para camping > Acessórios para colchões de ar e colchonetes: Bombas para colchões de ar e colchonetes; Kits de conserto de colchões de ar e colchonetes; Válvulas para colchões de ar e isolantes térmicos
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Camping i chodzenie po górach > Meble kempingowe > Akcesoria do materaców i poduszek dmuchanych: Pompki do materacy i poduszek dmuchanych; Zestawy naprawcze do materacy i poduszek dmuchanych; Zawory do materacy dmuchanych i mat do spania
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cắm trại & Đi bộ đường dài > Đồ cắm trại > Phụ kiện đệm hơi và đệm ngủ: Bơm đệm hơi và đệm ngủ; Bộ sản phẩm sửa chữa đệm hơi và đệm ngủ; Van đệm hơi và đệm ngủ
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การตั้งแคมป์และเดินเขา > เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับการตั้งแคมป์ > อุปกรณ์ที่นอนเป่าลมและแผ่นรองนอน: ปั๊มที่นอนเป่าลมและแผ่นรองนอน; ชุดซ่อมที่นอนเป่าลมและแผ่นรองนอน; วาล์วที่นอนเป่าลมและแผ่นรองนอน
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Кемпинги и походы > Кемпинговая мебель > Аксессуары для надувных матрасов и туристических ковриков: Насосы для надувных матрасов и туристических ковриков; Ремнаборы для надувных матрасов и туристических ковриков; Клапаны для надувных матрасов и туристических ковриков
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Camping și drumeții > Mobilier de camping > Accesorii pentru saltele pneumatice și inserții pentru dormit: Pompe pentru saltele pneumatice și inserții pentru dormit; Seturi pentru reparații saltele pneumatice și inserții pentru dormit; Valve pentru saltele gonflabile și saltele de camping
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Campismo e caminhada > Mobiliário de campismo > Acessórios de colchonete e colchão de ar: Bombas de colchonete e colchão de ar; Kits de reparação de colchonete e colchão de ar; Válvulas para colchões de ar e tapetes de dormir
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Camping og vandreture > Campingmøbler > Luftmadras – tilbehør: Pumper til luftmadrasser; Reparationssæt til luftmadrasser; Ventiler til luftmadrasser og liggeunderlag
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Retkeily ja vaellus > Retkikalusteet > Ilmapatjojen ja makuualustojen lisätarvikkeet: Ilmapatjojen ja makuualustojen pumput; Ilmapatjojen ja makuualustojen korjaussarjat; Ilmapatjojen ja makuualustojen venttiilit
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Къмпинг и туризъм > Къмпинг мебели > Аксесоари за надуваеми матраци и подложки за спане: Помпи за надуваеми матраци и подложки за спане; Комплекти за ремонт на надуваеми матраци и подложки за спане; Клапи за въздушни матраци и спални подложки
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Kempování a turistika > Kempinkový nábytek > Příslušenství k nafukovacím matracím: Nafukovací matrace a podložky na spaní – pumpy; Nafukovací matrace a podložky na spaní – opravné sady; Ventily pro nafukovací matrace a karimatky
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Camping y senderismo > Mobiliario de camping > Accesorios para colchones hinchables y esterillas: Bombas para colchones hinchables y esterillas; Kits de reparación de colchones hinchables y esterillas; Válvulas para colchones de aire y colchonetas de dormir
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 캠핑/하이킹 > 캠핑 용품 > 에어 매트리스/슬리핑 패드 부대용품: 에어 매트리스/슬리핑 패드 펌프; 에어 매트리스/슬리핑 패드 수리 키트; 에어 매트리스 및 슬리핑 패드 밸브
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 露營和健行 > 露營裝備 > 氣墊床/睡墊配件: 氣墊床/睡墊充氣機; 氣墊床/睡墊維修工具包; 充氣床墊與睡墊氣門
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kemping és túrázás > Tábori bútorok > Légmatrac- és alvóbetét-kiegészítők: Légmatrac- és alvóbetét-pumpák; Légmatrac- és alvóbetét-javítókészletek; Gumimatrac- és hálómatrac-szelepek
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Camping & Hiking > Camp Furniture > Air Mattress & Sleeping Pad Accessories: Air Mattress & Sleeping Pad Pumps; Air Mattress & Sleeping Pad Repair Kits; Air Mattress & Sleeping Pad Valves
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Stovyklavimas ir žygiai > Stovyklos baldai > Pripučiamų čiužinių ir pripučiamų kilimėlių priedai: Pripučiamų čiužinių ir pripučiamų kilimėlių pompos; Pripučiamų čiužinių ir pripučiamų kilimėlių remonto rinkiniai; Pripučiamų čiužinių ir pripučiamų kilimėlių vožtuvai
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 野营与远足 > 野营家具 > 充气床垫配件: 充气床垫/睡垫泵; 充气床垫/睡垫维修套件; 充气床垫与防潮垫气门
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kampçılık ve Doğa Yürüyüşü > Kamp Mobilyaları > Havalı Yatak Aksesuarları: Havalı Yatak ve Uyku Pedi Pompaları; Havalı Yatak ve Uyku Pedi Tamir Takımları; Şişme yatak ve uyku matı valfleri
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Camping & Wandern > Campingmöbel > Zubehör für Luftmatratzen & Schlafunterlagen: Pumpen für Luftmatratzen & Schlafunterlagen; Reparatursets für Luftmatratzen & Schlafunterlagen; Luftmatratzen- & Isomattenventile